Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0856.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the state transportation
department for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the
following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 3,213.3
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,499,621,400
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 4,555,300
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,495,066,100
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 2,374,354,200
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 86,948,500
Total private revenues 20,500,000
Total other state restricted revenues 6,013,263,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 102. DEBT SERVICE
Airport safety and protection plan $ 3,618,300
Blue Water Bridge fund 3,318,400
Economic development 234,300
Local bridge fund 77,300
State trunkline 333,554,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 340,802,400
Appropriated from:
Blue Water Bridge fund 3,318,400
Economic development fund 234,300
Local bridge fund 77,300
State aeronautics fund 3,618,300
State trunkline fund 333,554,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 103. INTERDEPARTMENTAL GRANTS
CTF grant to civil service commission $ 225,300
CTF grant to department of attorney general 112,600
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


CTF grant to department of technology,
management, and budget 45,400
CTF grant to department of treasury 54,900
CTF grant to legislative auditor general 47,800
MTF grant to department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy 2,277,200
MTF grant to department of state for collection
of revenue and fees 20,000,000
MTF grant to department of treasury 3,817,000
MTF grant to legislative auditor general 388,200
SAF grant to civil service commission 140,000
SAF grant to department of attorney general 196,900
SAF grant to department of technology,
management, and budget 32,900
SAF grant to department of treasury 72,200
SAF grant to legislative auditor general 37,600
STF grant to civil service commission 7,160,100
STF grant to department of attorney general 2,269,800
STF grant to department of state police 13,807,700
STF grant to department of technology,
management, and budget 1,409,700
STF grant to department of treasury 167,000
STF grant to legislative auditor general 901,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 53,163,900
Appropriated from:
Comprehensive transportation fund 486,000
Michigan transportation fund 26,482,400
State aeronautics fund 479,600
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


State trunkline fund 25,715,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 104. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 315.3
Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,023,100
Asset management council 2,299,900
Business support services--FTEs 77.0 13,696,500
Commission audit--FTEs 29.3 4,976,200
Economic development and enhancement programs--
FTEs 11.0 1,916,700
Finance, contracts, and support services--FTEs 198.0 30,444,900
Property management 8,616,000
Worker's compensation 1,546,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 64,519,600
Appropriated from:
IDG for accounting service center user charges 4,555,300
Comprehensive transportation fund 1,873,600
Economic development fund 414,900
Michigan transportation fund 5,237,800
State aeronautics fund 750,700
State trunkline fund 51,687,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 105. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 47,931,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 47,931,900
Appropriated from:
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Federal aid - transportation programs 536,400
Blue Water Bridge fund 60,300
Comprehensive transportation fund 245,400
Economic development fund 40,600
Michigan transportation fund 320,700
State aeronautics fund 191,400
State trunkline fund 46,537,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 106. TRANSPORTATION PLANNING
Full-time equated classified positions 142.0
Planning services--FTEs 142.0 $ 45,364,700
Grants to regional planning councils 488,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,853,500
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 26,000,000
Comprehensive transportation fund 366,200
Michigan transportation fund 11,473,700
State aeronautics fund 31,500
State trunkline fund 7,982,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 107. DESIGN AND ENGINEERING SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 1,654.3
Business services--FTEs 44.8 $ 11,386,400
Program development and delivery--FTEs 1,046.5 138,457,700
System operations management--FTEs 563.0 127,255,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 277,099,300
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 26,001,600
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Comprehensive transportation fund 187,100
Michigan transportation fund 20,238,400
State trunkline fund 230,672,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 108. HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE
Full-time equated classified positions 911.7
State trunkline operations--FTEs 911.7 $ 530,033,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 530,033,300
Appropriated from:
State trunkline fund 530,033,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 109. ROAD AND BRIDGE PROGRAMS
Cities and villages $ 1,112,369,700
County road commissions 2,012,101,400
Grants to local programs 33,000,000
Local agency wetland mitigation bank fund 2,000,000
Local bridge program 126,550,900
Local federal aid and road and bridge
construction 428,999,800
Movable bridge fund 6,504,600
Rail grade crossing 3,000,000
Rail grade crossing - surface improvements 3,000,000
State trunkline federal aid and road and bridge
construction 1,988,815,500
Rail grade separation fund 40,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,756,341,900
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 1,741,778,500
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Local funds 30,003,500
Private funds 10,000,000
Blue Water Bridge fund 29,026,400
Local bridge fund 26,550,900
Michigan transportation fund 2,408,775,700
State trunkline fund 607,006,900
Neighborhood roads fund 863,200,000
Local grade separation fund 40,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 110. BLUE WATER BRIDGE
Full-time equated classified positions 47.0
Blue Water Bridge operations--FTEs 47.0 $ 8,013,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,013,800
Appropriated from:
Blue Water Bridge fund 8,013,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 111. TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Forest roads $ 4,741,600
Rural county primary 10,620,800
Rural county urban system 2,500,000
Urban county congestion 10,620,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,483,200
Appropriated from:
Economic development fund 28,483,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 112. AERONAUTICS SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 48.0
Air service program $ 50,000
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Aviation services--FTEs 48.0 7,953,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,003,300
Appropriated from:
State aeronautics fund 8,003,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 113. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 50.0
Passenger transportation services--FTEs 50.0 $ 8,092,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,092,400
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 2,000,000
Comprehensive transportation fund 6,092,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 114. LOCAL BUS TRANSIT
Local bus operating $ 315,000,000
Nonurban operation/capital 41,935,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 356,935,500
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 39,935,500
Local funds 2,000,000
Comprehensive transportation fund 315,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 115. INTERCITY PASSENGER
Full-time equated classified positions 41.0
Detroit/Wayne County Port Authority $ 600,000
Freight property management 1,300,000
Intercity services 10,865,700
Office of rail--FTEs 41.0 7,587,000
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Rail operations and infrastructure 219,388,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 239,741,200
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 106,429,700
Local funds 260,000
Private funds 4,500,000
Comprehensive transportation fund 119,426,200
Intercity bus equipment fund 45,400
Michigan transportation fund 2,238,700
Rail freight fund 6,000,000
State trunkline fund 841,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 116. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION DEVELOPMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 4.0
Municipal credit program $ 2,000,000
Service initiatives 6,300,000
Specialized services 30,615,900
Van pooling 300,000
Intermodal capital 298,832,200
Infrastructure projects authority program 65,000,000
Maritime and ports facility assistance program 5,294,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 408,342,800
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 161,672,500
Local funds 37,185,000
Private funds 4,000,000
Comprehensive transportation fund 135,190,600
Infrastructure projects authority fund 65,000,000
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Maritime and ports facility assistance fund 5,294,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 117. CAPITAL OUTLAY
(1) BUILDINGS AND FACILITIES
Salt storage buildings and containment control $ 3,300,000
Special maintenance, remodeling, and additions 5,350,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,650,500
Appropriated from:
State trunkline fund 8,650,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
(2) AIRPORT IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS
Airport safety, protection and improvement
program $ 181,309,800
Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport 6,435,000
IIJA airport infrastructure grants 115,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 302,744,800
Appropriated from:
Federal aid - transportation programs 270,000,000
Local funds 17,500,000
Private funds 2,000,000
Qualified airport fund 6,435,000
State aeronautics fund 6,809,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 118. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Coloma salt storage building $ 5,168,100
Facilities capital outlay 5,600,000
Great Lakes Tunnel project - phase II oversight 4,100,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,868,100
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Appropriated from:
State trunkline fund 10,768,100
Michigan infrastructure fund 4,100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state
constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under
part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 is
$6,013,263,400.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid
to local units of government for fiscal year 2027 is
$3,887,048,500.00. The itemized statement below identifies
appropriations from which spending to local units of government
will occur:
STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT
Grants to regional planning councils $ 488,800
Cities and villages 1,112,369,700
County road commissions 2,012,101,400
Grants to local programs 33,000,000
Local agency wetland mitigation bank fund 2,000,000
Local bridge program 126,550,900
Local grade separation program 40,000,000
Movable bridge fund 3,252,300
Rail grade crossing 1,500,000
Rail grade crossing - surface improvements 3,000,000
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Forest roads 4,741,600
Rural county primary 10,620,800
Rural county urban system 2,500,000
Urban county congestion 10,620,800
Air service program 50,000
Local bus operating 315,000,000
Detroit/Wayne County Port Authority 600,000
Infrastructure projects authority program 65,000,000
Intermodal capital 118,890,600
Municipal credit program 2,000,000
Service initiatives 1,000,000
Specialized services 13,000,000
Airport safety, protection, and improvement
program 6,809,800
Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport 6,435,000
Total payments to local units of government $ 3,887,048,500
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "CTF" means comprehensive transportation fund.
(b) "Department" means the state transportation department.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(e) "IIJA" means the infrastructure investment and jobs act,
2021, Public Law 117-58.
(f) "MTF" means Michigan transportation fund.
(g) "SAF" means state aeronautics fund.
(h) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


appropriations subcommittees on transportation, the senate and
house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the
state budget office.
(i) "STF" means state trunkline fund.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same archivable location. The department or
agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard
recipients and to the house and senate appropriations committees.
The report must include all of the following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental programs or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $40,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $11,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each
department or agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


for services or supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
FTE positions in pay status by civil service classification,
including a comparison by line item of the number of FTE positions
authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number
of FTE positions employed by the department at the end of the
reporting period. The report must be submitted to the senate and
house appropriations committees and to the standard report
recipients.
Sec. 216. (1) A department or agency shall maximize
utilization of its in-person state workforce. A department or
agency shall prioritize occupancy utilization of office space for
each division within the department or agency. Employees with job
responsibilities that require the employees to serve in their
capacities outside of an office shall be monitored each pay period
to ensure all work hours reported on the timesheet were actually
worked.
(2) A department or agency shall comply with requirements set
forth by the office of the state employer on in-person work and
utilization and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-
person work is optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher,
subject to market conditions.
(3) A department or agency shall adhere to civil service rules
and regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. A department or agency shall
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


establish policies and processes to ensure all employees are
working their jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 218. A department or agency receiving appropriations in
part 1 shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from
appropriations in part 1. A department or agency shall follow
federal and state law and guidelines for short-term and long-term
retention of records. A department or agency may electronically
retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and
state guidelines.
Sec. 219. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include a reference to the public
act that necessitates the policy change. The department shall
submit the report to the standard report recipients, the senate and
house appropriations committees, and the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 221. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 222. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 232. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing significant federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to, significantly impact the
operations of the department, including reductions in federal
revenue and changes that are likely to lead to a reduction in the
department's ability to safeguard the health or welfare of the
public.
Sec. 234. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2026 are estimated at $34,726,300.00. From this amount, total
department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $34,726,300.00. Total department appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 235. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 236. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 237. Not later than November 15, the department must
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 239. (1) Not later than 30 days after the enactment of
this act, the house of representatives and senate shall provide to
the state budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively
directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in 2025 PA 32
and 2025 PA 33. The list must include all information and documents
pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance
with 2025 PA 32 and 2025 PA 33.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 240. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial closeout period.
Sec. 241. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 242. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose.
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.

DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Sec. 301. The department may establish a fee schedule and
collect fees sufficient to cover the costs to issue the permits
that the department is authorized by law to issue on request,
unless otherwise stipulated by law. All permit fees are
nonrefundable application fees and must be credited to the
appropriate fund to recover the direct and indirect costs of
receiving, reviewing, and processing the requests.
Sec. 302. Not later than December 31, the department shall
submit, to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons
of the senate and house of representatives appropriations
committees, a report that includes the estimated available fund
balances for all of the following:
(a) The transportation economic development fund.
(b) The local grade separation fund.
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


(c) The infrastructure projects authority fund.
(d) The comprehensive transportation fund.
(e) The Michigan transportation fund.
(f) The state aeronautics fund.
(g) The contracting opportunity loan fund.
(h) The local bridge fund.
(i) The movable bridge fund.
(j) The intercity bus equipment and facility fund.
(k) The rail freight fund.
(l) The recreation improvement fund.
(m) The neighborhood roads fund.
(n) The maritime and port fund.
(o) The Blue Water Bridge fund.
(p) The local agency wetland mitigation bank fund.
Sec. 303. (1) The department shall not utilize bridge bundling
contracting methods for projects involving the construction,
rehabilitation, or replacement of bridges delivered through the
local agency program unless all of the following conditions apply:
(a) A local agency program bridge bundling project package is
limited to a maximum of 5 bridges.
(b) A local agency program bridge bundling project package
must be confined to a single department region or limited to
contiguous counties.
(c) The department shall not impose any bidder qualification
requirements beyond standard prequalification. The department shall
not use requests for qualifications, statements of qualifications,
shortlisting, or other additional prerequisites for bidders.
(2) Bridge bundling for state trunkline or freeway projects
may be utilized where multiple structures are contiguous or nearly
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


contiguous, or if bundling is required for traffic control, cost
efficiency, or federal funding participation.
Sec. 304. If, as a requirement of bidding on a highway
project, the department requires a contractor to submit financial
or proprietary documentation as to how the bid was calculated, the
department shall keep that bid documentation confidential and shall
not disclose that bid documentation other than to a department
representative without the contractor's written consent. The
department may disclose the bid documentation if necessary to
address or defend a claim by a contractor.
Sec. 306. (1) The amounts appropriated in part 1 to support
tax and fee collection, law enforcement, and other program services
provided to the department and to transportation funds by other
state departments must be expended from transportation funds
pursuant to annual contracts between the department and those other
state departments. The contracts must be executed before the
expenditure or obligation of those funds. The contracts must
provide, but are not limited to, the following data applicable to
each state department:
(a) Estimated costs to be recovered from transportation funds.
(b) Description of services provided to the department and/or
transportation funds and financed with transportation funds.
(c) Detailed cost allocation methods appropriate to the type
of services being provided and the activities financed with
transportation funds.
(2) Not later than 2 months after publication of the state of
Michigan annual comprehensive financial report, each state
department receiving funding pursuant to an interdepartment
contract with the department shall submit a written report to the
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


department, the state budget director, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, and the auditor general stating by spending authorization
account the amount of estimated funds contracted with the
department, the amount of funds expended, the amount of funds
returned to the transportation funds, and any unreimbursed
transportation-related costs incurred but not billed to
transportation funds.
Sec. 307. Before March 1, the department shall provide to the
legislature, the state budget director, and the senate and house
fiscal agencies its rolling 5-year plan listing by county or by
county road commission all highway construction projects for the
fiscal year and all expected projects for the ensuing fiscal years.
Sec. 309. (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a state contract
for a pavement marking project or for the purchase of materials for
a pavement marking project must include in the contract a
requirement that, in any yellow water-based paint product procured,
all yellow pigments permanently incorporated in the material must
be manufactured in the United States according to the rules of
origin under the United States-Mexico-Canada agreement, Public Law
116-113.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to use cement
manufactured in the United States according to the rules of origin
under the United States-Mexico-Canada agreement, Public Law 116-
113.
Sec. 310. The department shall post in a timely manner copies
of the agenda, approved minutes, and audio recording of state
transportation commission meetings.
Sec. 313. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may increase a state infrastructure bank program and
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


grant or loan funds in accordance with regulations of the state
infrastructure bank program of the United States Department of
Transportation. The department shall administer the state
infrastructure bank for the purpose of providing a revolving, self-
sustaining resource for financing transportation infrastructure
projects.
(2) In addition to funds provided in subsection (1), money
received by this state as federal grants, repayment of state
infrastructure bank loans, or other reimbursement or revenue
received by this state as a result of projects funded by the
program and interest earned on that money must be deposited in the
revolving state infrastructure bank fund and must be available for
transportation infrastructure projects. At the close of the fiscal
year, any unencumbered funds remaining in the state infrastructure
bank fund remain in the fund and carry forward into the succeeding
fiscal year.
(3) The department shall prepare a report on the status of the
state infrastructure bank and submit the report to the standard
report recipients on or before December 31, 2026. The report must
include all of the following:
(a) The balance in the state infrastructure bank on September
30, 2026, including a breakdown of the balance by cash and cash
equivalents, outstanding loans, and balance available for loan to
local agencies.
(b) A breakdown of the state infrastructure loan balance by
amounts originating from federal sources and the amounts
originating from nonfederal sources.
(c) A list of outstanding loans by agency, original loan
amount, project description, loan term, and amount outstanding.
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


Sec. 314. (1) The MI contracting opportunity loan fund is
created within the state treasury.
(2) Funds deposited into the MI contracting opportunity loan
fund originally created in section 1003 of article 15 of 2024 PA
121 or money received by the state as repayment of loans or
interest earned on loan funds is appropriated and shall be
available for future loans.
(3) At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered funds
remaining in the fund shall be carried forward into the succeeding
fiscal year.
Sec. 315. The department shall use any additional funds in the
moveable bridge fund to cover other costs for any required local
federal bridge load analysis, inspection, or other local federal
mandate.
Sec. 383. (1) The department shall prepare a report on the use
of department-owned aircraft during the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2026. With respect to each department-owned aircraft,
the report must include all of the following:
(a) Total hours of usage.
(b) Description of specific flights, including dates of
travel, names of passengers, including state agency, university, or
local government affiliation, travel origin and destination, and
total estimated costs associated with the air travel.
(2) The department shall submit the report as required under
section 204 no later than February 1, 2027.
(3) The department shall maintain a system for recovering the
cost of operating department-owned aircraft through charges to
aircraft users.
Sec. 384. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2),
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


the department shall not obligate this state to expend any state
transportation revenue for construction planning or construction of
the Gordie Howe International Crossing or a renamed successor. In
addition, except as provided in subsection (2), the department
shall not commit this state to any new contract related to the
construction planning or construction of the Gordie Howe
International Crossing or a renamed successor that would obligate
this state to expend any state transportation revenue. An
expenditure for staff resources used in connection with project
activities that is subject to full and prompt reimbursement from
Canada is not considered an expenditure of state transportation
revenue.
(2) If the legislature enacts specific enabling legislation
for the construction of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or a
renamed successor, subsection (1) does not apply once the enabling
legislation goes into effect.
Sec. 385. (1) The department shall submit monthly reports to
the standard report recipients, the speaker of the house of
representatives, the house of representatives minority leader, the
senate majority leader, and the senate minority leader on all of
the following:
(a) All expenditures made by this state related to the Gordie
Howe Bridge.
(b) All reimbursements made by Canada under section 384(1) of
this part to this state for expenditures for staff resources used
in connection with project activities.
(c) All eminent domain and condemnation powers used, the
related real estate involved in any governmental taking, the price
paid for those properties, and the beneficiary's name or associated
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


corporation.
(2) The department shall submit the initial report required
under subsection (1) on or before December 1. The initial report
must cover the prior fiscal year.
Sec. 389. (1) Within 30 days after entering into a long-term
agreement with a private contractor, a public agency, or a
partnership between 1 or more private contractors or public
agencies, the department shall notify the state budget director,
the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on
transportation, and the senate and house fiscal agencies of the
agreement, including the subject of the agreement, the term of the
agreement, and financial obligations under the agreement.
(2) As used in this section, "long-term agreement" means an
agreement that obligates the department for a period of 5 years or
more and that actually or contingently obligates the department to
make payments over the contract period of $10,000,000.00 or more.
Sec. 395. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for state
trunkline federal aid road and bridge construction, the department
may expend up to $10,000,000.00 on highway maintenance activities
to support safety-related, high-priority, and other deferred
routine maintenance needs on the state trunkline network.
Sec. 398. The department shall continue to work to eliminate
fatalities and serious injuries on the state trunkline network and
shall maintain the Toward Zero Deaths statewide safety campaign.

MICHIGAN TRANSPORTATION FUND
Sec. 501. The money received under the motor carrier act, 1933
PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, and not appropriated to the department
of licensing and regulatory affairs or the department of state
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


police is deposited in the Michigan transportation fund.
Sec. 502. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered
and unexpended balance in the movable bridge fund remains in the
movable bridge fund and carries forward.
Sec. 503. (1) At the close of the fiscal year, funds
appropriated in part 1 for the transportation economic development
program shall lapse to the transportation economic development
fund.
(2) At the close of the fiscal year, funds appropriated in
part 1 for the local bridge program shall carry forward.
(3) Interest earned in the transportation economic development
fund and local bridge fund shall remain in the respective funds and
shall be allocated to the respective programs based on actual
interest earned at the end of each fiscal year.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
transportation economic development fund and local bridge fund may
receive federal, local, or private funds or restricted source funds
such as interest earnings.
(5) None of the funds statutorily dedicated to the
transportation economic development fund and local bridge fund
shall be diverted to other projects.
Sec. 504. Funds from the Michigan transportation fund must be
distributed to the comprehensive transportation fund, the economic
development fund, the recreation improvement fund, and the state
trunkline fund, in accordance with this part and part 1 and part
711 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994
PA 451, MCL 324.71101 to 324.71108, and may only be used as
specified in this part and part 1, 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.651 to
247.675, and part 711 of the natural resources and environmental
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.71101 to 324.71108.

STATE TRUNKLINE FUND
Sec. 604. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered
and unexpended balance in the state trunkline fund remains in the
state trunkline fund and carries forward.
Sec. 651. Funds from the neighborhood roads fund must be
distributed and are appropriated to the local grade separation
fund, comprehensive transportation fund, infrastructure projects
authority fund, and the state trunkline fund, in accordance with
this part and part 1 and section 13c of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c.
Sec. 652. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered
and unexpended balance in the neighborhood roads fund not
previously allocated under sections (a) through (e) of section
13c(5) of 1951 PA 51, 247.663c, remains in the neighborhood roads
fund and carries forward.

TRANSIT AND RAIL RELATED FUNDS
Sec. 701. The department shall establish an intercity bus
equipment and facility fund as a subsidiary fund within the
comprehensive transportation fund created under section 10b of 1951
PA 51, MCL 247.660b. Proceeds received by this state from the sale
of state-owned intercity bus equipment must be credited to the
intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the purchase and
repair of intercity bus equipment, as appropriated. Security
deposits not returned to a lessee of state-owned intercity bus
equipment under terms of the lease agreement must be credited to
the intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the repair of
intercity bus equipment, as appropriated. Money received by the
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


department from lease payments for state-owned intercity bus
equipment, and facility maintenance charges under terms of leases
of state-owned intercity facilities, must be credited to the
intercity bus equipment and facility fund for the purchase and
repair of intercity bus equipment or for the maintenance and
rehabilitation of state-owned intercity facilities, as
appropriated. At the close of the fiscal year, any funds remaining
in the intercity bus equipment and facility fund remain in the fund
and are carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year.
Sec. 702. Money that is received by this state as repayment
for loans made for rail or water freight capital projects, and as a
result of the sale of property or equipment used or projected to be
used for rail or water freight projects must be deposited in the
rail freight fund created by section 17 of the state transportation
preservation act of 1976, 1976 PA 295, MCL 474.67. At the close of
the fiscal year, any funds remaining in the rail freight fund
remain in the fund and are carried forward into the succeeding
fiscal year.
Sec. 704. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall prepare and transmit a report that provides detail
regarding the department's obligations for programs funded under
the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and infrastructure.
The report shall include a breakdown of the appropriation by
program, year-to-date obligations under each program itemized by
project, and an estimate of future obligations under each program
itemized by project for the remainder of the fiscal year. The
report shall also include a listing of all active rail related
federal grants. The initial report shall be submitted to the
standard report recipients on or before March 1. The department
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


also shall update and resubmit a final report on or before
September 30.
Sec. 707. (1) Before March 1, 2027, the department shall
provide to the legislature, the state budget office, and the senate
and house fiscal agencies its rail strategic plan. The strategic
plan must include, but is not limited to, a rolling 5-year rail
plan and a summary of the department's obligations for programs
funded under the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and
infrastructure.
(2) The rolling 5-year rail plan must include, but is not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) A listing by county of all rail infrastructure projects on
rail lines within this state utilizing state funds, and the
estimated cost of each project.
(b) The actual or projected state expenditures for operation
of passenger rail service.
(c) The actual or projected state expenditures for maintenance
of passenger service rail lines.
(3) The period of the rolling 5-year rail plan must include
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 and the immediately
following 4 fiscal years.
(4) The summary of the department's obligations for programs
funded under the appropriation in part 1 for rail operations and
infrastructure must include a breakdown of the appropriation by
program, year-to-year obligations under each program itemized by
project, and an estimate of future obligations under each program
itemized by project for the remainder of the fiscal year.
(5) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for rail operation
and infrastructure, not less than $20,000,000.00 must be allocated
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


for the support of rail-related economic development projects and
rail freight system preservation projects.
Sec. 735. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, the
appropriation to a street railway pursuant to section 10e(22) of
1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660e, is $0.00.

AERONAUTICS FUND
Sec. 801. Except as otherwise provided in section 903 of this
part for capital outlay, at the close of the fiscal year, any
unobligated and unexpended balance in the state aeronautics fund
created in the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA
327, MCL 259.1 to 259.208, lapses to the state aeronautics fund and
may be appropriated by the legislature in the immediately
succeeding fiscal year.

CAPITAL OUTLAY
Sec. 901. (1) From federal-state-local project appropriations
contained in part 1 for the purpose of assisting political entities
and subdivisions of this state in the construction and improvement
of publicly used airports and landing fields within this state, the
state transportation department may permit the award of contracts
on behalf of units of local government for the authorized locations
not to exceed the indicated amounts, of which the state allocated
portion must not exceed the amount appropriated in part 1.
(2) Political entities and subdivisions shall provide not less
than 5% of the cost of any project under this section, unless a
total nonfederal share less than 10% is otherwise specified in
federal law. State money must not be allocated until local money is
allocated. State money for any 1 project must not exceed 1/3 of the
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


total appropriation in part 1 from state funds for airport
improvement programs.
(3) The Michigan aeronautics commission may take those steps
necessary to match federal money available for airport construction
and improvement within this state and to meet the matching
requirements of the federal government. Whether acting alone or
jointly with another political subdivision or public agency or with
this state, a political subdivision or public agency of this state
shall not submit to any agency of the federal government a project
application for airport planning or development unless it is
authorized in this part and part 1 and the project application is
approved by the governing body of each political subdivision or
public agency making the application and by the Michigan
aeronautics commission.
Sec. 903. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay are
carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with the
provisions of section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA
431, MCL 18.1248.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1001. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
Great Lakes Tunnel project – phase II oversight are designated as a
work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted
funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be
available for expenditures for projects under this section until
the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance
with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the work project is to support planning,
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz


construction oversight, and administration of the Great Lakes
Tunnel project by the Mackinac Straits corridor authority, in
accordance with section 14d of 1952 PA 214, MCL 254.324d.
(b) The work project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $4,100,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Final Page
JJR S06117'26 (S-1) wmkjfz